North Carolina, session 2025, HB766.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child and Family Well-Being, the sum of one million
eight hundred seventy-three thousand eight hundred sixty-three dollars ($1,873,863) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to expand access to Teen Mental Health First
Aid training in North Carolina.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H766-v-1*